Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2437
Business combination, defined.

Business combination, when used in reference to any issuing public corporation and any interested shareholder of the issuing public corporation, shall mean:

(1) Any merger or consolidation of the issuing public corporation or any subsidiary of the issuing public corporation with:

(a) The interested shareholder; or

(b) Any other corporation, whether or not such other corporation is an interested shareholder of the issuing public corporation, that is or after the merger or consolidation would be an affiliate or associate of the interested shareholder;

(2) Any sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, transfer, or other disposition in a single transaction or a series of transactions to or with the interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of the interested shareholder of assets of the issuing public corporation or any subsidiary of the issuing public corporation:

(a) Having an aggregate market value equal to ten percent or more of the aggregate market value of all the assets, determined on a consolidated basis, of the issuing public corporation; or

(b) Having an aggregate market value equal to ten percent or more of the aggregate market value of all the outstanding shares of the issuing public corporation;

(3) Any transaction or series of transactions which results in the issuance or transfer by the corporation or by any subsidiary of the corporation of any stock of the corporation or of such subsidiary to the interested shareholder if such stock has an aggregate market value equal to at least five percent of the aggregate market value of all the outstanding shares of the corporation except pursuant to the exercise of warrants or rights to purchase stock offered or distributed, or a dividend or distribution paid or made, pro rata to all shareholders of the issuing public corporation and except pursuant to the exercise or conversion of securities exercisable for or convertible into stock of such corporation or any such subsidiary, which securities were outstanding prior to the time that the interested shareholder became an interested shareholder;

(4) Any transaction involving the corporation or any subsidiary of the corporation which has the effect, directly or indirectly, of increasing the proportionate share of the stock of any class or series, or securities convertible into the stock of any class or series, of the corporation or of any such subsidiary which is owned directly or indirectly by the interested shareholder except as a result of immaterial changes due to fractional share adjustments; or

(5) Any receipt by the interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of the interested shareholder of the benefit, directly or indirectly, except proportionately as a shareholder of the issuing public corporation, of any loans, advances, guarantees, pledges, or other financial assistance or any tax credits or other tax advantages provided by or through the issuing public corporation or any subsidiary of the issuing public corporation.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 7.